fi: Varren materiaali: Akryyli; Ebonite; Lucite; Metalli; Muovi; Puu; Muu
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำก้านท่อ: อะคริลิก; Ebonite; ลูไซต์; โลหะ; พลาสติก; ไม้; อื่นๆ
it: Materiale del cannello: Acrilico; Ebonite; Lucite; Metallo; Plastica; Legno; Altro
da: Stammemateriale: Akryl; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plast; Træ; Andet
tr: Ağızlık sapı malzemesi: Akrilik; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plastik; Ahşap; Diğer
ko: 스템 재료: 아크릴; Ebonite; 루사이트; 금속; 플라스틱; 목재; 기타
es: Material del tallo: Acrílico; Ebonite; Lucita; Metal; Plástico; Madera; Otro
el: Υλικό στελέχους πίπας: Ακρυλικό; Ebonite; Lucite; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Ξύλο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal stabljike: Akril; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plastika; Drvo; Ostalo
nb: Stilkmateriale: Akryl; Ebonite; Lucite; Metall; Plast; Tre; Annet
pl: Materiał cybucha: Akryl; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plastik; Drewno; Inne
sk-SK: Materiál drieku: Akryl; Ebonite; Lucit; Kov; Plast; Drevo; Iné
sv: Stammaterial: Akryl; Ebonite; Lucite; Metall; Plast; Trä; Övrigt
hu: Pipaszár anyaga: Akril; Ebonite; Lucite; Fém; Műanyag; Fa; Egyéb
pt-BR: Piteira material: Acrílico; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plástico; Madeira; Outro
zh-TW: 煙管材質: 壓克力; Ebonite; Lucite; 金屬; 塑膠; 木材; 其他
zh-CN: 烟嘴材质: 亚克力; Ebonite; 透明有机玻璃 (Lucite); 金属; 塑料; 木材; 其他
ro-RO: Material al muștiucului: Acril; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plastic; Lemn; Altele
de: Material des Pfeifenstiels: Acryl; Ebonite; Lucite; Metall; Kunststoff; Holz; Andere
sl-SI: Material ustnika: Akril; Ebonite; Lucite; Kovina; Plastika; Les; Drugo
vi: Vật liệu thân cây: Acrylic; Ebonite; Lucite; Kim loại; Nhựa; Gỗ; Khác
lt-LT: Kandiklio medžiaga: Akrilas; Ebonite; Liusitas; Metalas; Plastikas; Mediena; Kita
ja: ステム素材: アクリル; Ebonite; ルーサイト; メタル; プラスチック; ウッド; その他
cs: Materiál dýmky: Akryl; Ebonit; Lucite; Kov; Plast; Dřevo; Jiné
ru: Материал мундштука: Акрил; Эбонит; Люцит; Металл; Пластик; Дерево; Другое
fr: Matériau du tuyau: Acrylique; Ebonite; Lucite; Métal; Plastique; Bois; Autre
nl: StammateriaalStem materiaal: Acryl; Ebonite; Lucite; Metaal; Plastic; Hout; Overig
bg-BG: Материал на мундщука: Акрил; Ebonite; Луцит; Метал; Пластмаса; Дърво; Друго
pt-PT: Material da haste: Acrílico; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plástico; Madeira; Outro
en: Stem material: Acrylic; Ebonite; Lucite; Metal; Plastic; Wood; Other